District of Columbia statutes.
8-1422

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Capitol Exclusion Zone” means all points within 2.2 miles of the United States Capitol Building; provided, that the Capitol Exclusion Zone shall not extend beyond the geographic boundaries of the District of Columbia.

(2)

“Emergency” means an unanticipated, temporary situation that threatens the immediate safety of individuals or property, as determined by the District Department of Transportation.

(3)

“Person” means an individual or a commercial entity.

(4)

“Practical alternative route” means a route:

(A)

Which lies entirely outside the Capitol Exclusion Zone; and

(B)

Whose use would not make shipment of the materials in question cost-prohibitive.

Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-80, § 3, 53 DCR 1047
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3 of Terrorism Prevention in Hazardous Materials Transportation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-325, March 23, 2006, 53 DCR 2576).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3 of Second Terrorism Prevention in Hazardous Materials Transportation Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-236, December 22, 2005, 53 DCR 245).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3 of Terrorism Prevention in Hazardous Materials Transportation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-90, June 1, 2005, 52 DCR 5428).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3 of Terrorism Prevention in Hazardous Materials Transportation Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-43, February 15, 2005, 52 DCR 3048).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 3 of Terrorism Prevention in Hazardous Materials Transportation Temporary Act of 2005 (D.C. Law 16-2, May 14, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 5425).